Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB45.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 325.261 is amended to read as follows:
The license of "certified public accountant" shall be granted by the board to any person who satisfies the following
requirements:
(1) Is no less than eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) Is of good moral character;
(3) Has completed at least one (1) of the following:
(a) A post-baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university recognized by the board
with a major or concentration in accounting or its equivalent, as defined in administrative
regulations promulgated by the board;
(b) A baccalaureate degree plus an additional thirty (30) semester credit hours, conferred by a college or
university acceptable to the board, provided the total educational program includes a concentration
in accounting or its equivalent, as defined in administrative regulations promulgated by the board; or
(c) A baccalaureate degree[ or master's degree] conferred by a college or university recognized by the
board with a major or concentration in accounting or its equivalent, as defined in administrative
regulations promulgated by the board;
(4) Passes a board-approved examination in accounting, auditing, and other related subjects as the board deems
appropriate. To be eligible to apply for the examination, a person shall first satisfy the requirement of
subsections (1), (2), and [to ](3) of this section;
(5) [Completes one hundred fifty (150) college semester hours that include a baccalaureate or masters degree
conferred by a college or university recognized by the board with a major or concentration in accounting or its
equivalent, as defined in administrative regulations promulgated by the board;
(6) ]Obtains one (1) year of accounting or attest experience if applying for a license based on the educational
requirement under subsection (3)(a) or (b) of this section, or obtains two (2) years of accounting or attest
experience if applying for a license based on the educational requirement under subsection (3)(c) of this
section. The experience required by this subsection shall be obtained:
(a) While employed in[ an accounting or auditing position in] public practice, industry, or government
and[that] shall be verified by a certified public accountant who, during the time being verified, held an
active license to practice from any state;[. The one (1) year of experience required under this subsection
shall be obtained:]
(b)[(a)] After the completion of the education requirements established in subsection (3)(c) of this
section; and
(c)[(b)] Within five (5) years from the date the candidate successfully completed the examination;
(6)[(7)] At the time of applying for a license is a United States citizen, a citizen of a foreign country who is
legally residing in the United States, or is an employee of a public accounting firm, company, or an institution
of postsecondary education located outside the United States, but which has an office or campus located in the
United States; and
(7)[(8)] Submits a complete application for a license to practice as a certified public accountant in accordance
with KRS 325.330.
Section 2. KRS 325.282 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who does not have an office located in this state and holds a valid license in good standing to
practice as a certified public accountant from any state [:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Does not have an office located in this state;
(b) Holds a valid and active license to practice as a certified public accountant from any state that the board has
determined to have licensure requirements substantially equivalent to those found in this chapter and the
accompanying administrative regulations promulgated thereunder; and
(c) Offers to perform or performs a regulated activity in person or by mail, telephone, or other electronic means in
this state;
]shall have all the practice privileges granted to the holder of a license issued under this chapter without
having to obtain a license from the board if at the time of initial licensure, the person was required to show
evidence of having met the following requirements:
(a) Passage of a board-approved examination in accounting, auditing, and other related subjects as the
board deems appropriate; and
(b) Attainment of the education and experience requirements set forth in subsections (3) and (5) of
Section 1 of this Act.
(2) A person whose principal place of business is not in this state shall continue to have all the privileges of
licensees in this state without the need to obtain a license from the board if, as of June 30, 2025, the person:
(a) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state; and
(b) Has practice privileges in this state under this chapter.
(3)[(2)] Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person who satisfies the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Is not required to provide notice of offering or providing such services to the board; and
(b) Is subject to the requirements listed in subsection (4)[(3)] of this section.
(4)[(3)] A person who offers to perform or performs a regulated activity in person or by mail, telephone, or
other electronic means in this state pursuant to this section agrees to:
(a) Submit to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;
(b) Comply with the provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations of the board;
(c) Cease exercising the privilege if the license issued by the board or agency located in the state of the
person's principal place of business expires or is no longer valid;
(d) The appointment of the state board or agency where the person's principal place of business is located
and which issued the person's license as the agent upon whom process may be served in any action or
proceeding by the Kentucky State Board of Accountancy against that person;
(e) Notify the board prior to opening any office in this state and immediately apply for a license under KRS
325.280; and
(f) Notify the board immediately if the person's license in the state where his or her principal place of
business is located becomes inactive, lapses, or is subjected to any disciplinary action.
(5)[(4)] The board may take disciplinary action against a person granted a privilege under this section for an act
committed by the person in another state if the act at the time of its commission is a violation of that state's law
or regulations and this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.
(6)[(5)] A person who qualifies for the practice privilege under this section and offers to perform or performs
one (1) or more of the following services for a client with its home office located in this state or for a person
who is a resident of this state shall perform the service or services through a firm which has obtained a license
issued under KRS 325.301:
(a) Any financial statement audit or other engagement to be performed in accordance with the Statements
on Auditing Standards;
(b) Any examination of prospective financial statements to be performed in accordance with the Statements
on Standards for Attestation Engagements; or
(c) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
Auditing Standards.

CHAPTER 21 3
(7) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the board determines after evaluation that
another state has granted certified public accountant licenses without requiring candidates to meet
minimum qualifications acceptable to the board and continue to satisfy minimum continuing
professional educational requirements acceptable to the board, the board may revoke practice
privileges in this state for certified public accountants licensed by that state.
(b) Individual certified public accountants from states for which practice privileges have been revoked
may continue to qualify for practice privileges in Kentucky if the person would meet licensing and
continuing education requirements of this state.
Section 3. KRS 325.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may issue a license to practice by reciprocity, if the applicant:
(a) Submits an application for a license to practice any regulated activity, upon forms approved by the
board;
(b) Pays all required fees, in the amounts as determined by administrative regulation promulgated by the
board; and
(c) Meets the following requirements:
1. Satisfies the educational requirement in KRS 325.261(3);
2. Receives a grade on the Uniform CPA Examination in another state that was equivalent to a
passing grade at the time in this Commonwealth;
3. Holds a valid active license, and is in good standing as a certified public accountant, issued under
the laws of any other state; and
4. Meets all current experience requirements in this chapter, except for KRS 325.261(5)(c)[(6)(b)],
at the time application is made, or within the ten (10) years immediately preceding the
application, had four (4) years of experience in the practice of the regulated activities acceptable
to the board upon which the license was based.
(2) The board may issue a license to practice the regulated activities without examination to an applicant who
holds a valid license to engage in the practice of the regulated activities in good standing from a foreign
country if:
(a) The applicant's foreign country makes similar provisions to allow a person who holds a valid license to
practice the regulated activities issued by this Commonwealth to obtain that foreign country's
comparable designation;
(b) The authority of the foreign country that issued the designation regulates the practice of the regulated
activities, including the issuance of reports;
(c) The foreign designation was granted upon education and examination requirements which were
established by the foreign authority or law and were substantially equivalent to those in effect in this
Commonwealth at the time the foreign designation was granted;
(d) The applicant satisfies the applicable experience requirement contained in paragraph (c) of subsection
(1) of this section;
(e) The applicant has successfully passed a uniform qualifying examination on United States national
standards prepared by the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy; and
(f) The applicant submits an application for a license to practice the regulated activities, upon forms
approved by the board, and pays the fees listed in administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
Section 4. The following KRS section is repealed:
325.263 Submission of proof of educational requirements on and after April 1, 2007, by previously approved
candidates.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version